Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5464.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. A new section is added to chapter 46.25 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department shall initiate the rule-making process to update WAC 308-100-020 to clarify how federal motor carrier safety administration standards related to a person's country of domicile and immigration status impact the ability to receive or renew a commercial driver's license.(2) The department shall provide regular training to staff that handle applications for the issuance and renewal of commercial driver's licenses on the following items:(a) The documentation necessary to show proof of citizenship, lawful residency, or nondomiciled status in order to receive or renew a commercial driver's license;(b) The options available to applicants for issuance or renewal of a commercial driver's license based on the applicant's country of domicile and immigration status; and(c) Steps to guide applicants for issuance or renewal to the proper application or renewal materials based on the applicant's country of domicile and immigration status.(3) The department shall regularly update the training outlined in subsection (2) of this section to maintain alignment with federal requirements and to best serve commercial driver's license applicants and holders.(4) The department shall make available to all commercial driver's license training schools, commercial driver's license applicants, and commercial driver's license holders, materials on how a person's country of domicile and immigration status might impact their ability to receive or renew a commercial driver's license. The materials must provide information on the licensing options available to a person based on the person's country of domicile and immigration status as well as any exceptions to the licensure standards issued by the federal motor carrier safety administration.--- END ---